Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2273
Individuals less than nineteen years of age; establishment of programs; authorized.

The school district and the district court, county court, or juvenile court may establish education, counseling, or other programs to improve the behavior and educational performance of individuals covered by section 29-2270.

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 4.